Massachusetts, session 194th, H2218.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any special or general law to the contrary, the Secretary of
the Executive Office of Health and Human Services (EOHHS) shall direct the Commissioners of
the Department of Mental Health (DMH), the Department of Youth Services (DYS), the
Department of Children and Families (DCF), the Department of Public Health (DPH), and the
Department of Personnel Administration, to update the official Job Classification Specifications
to include Licensed Mental Health Counselors(LMHCs) and Licensed Supervised Mental Health
Counselors (LSMHCs) to the full extent of their scopes’ of practice.
SECTION 2. Said revisions to the Job Classification Specifications must be completed by
September 1, 2023. All relevant behavioral health job postings for positions in the
aforementioned Departments under the jurisdiction of EEOHS will reflect these revisions by
September 1, 2023.
of 1